Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Municipally Owned Utilities
§ 21-27-40.
Contract for extension of natural gas transmission lines into, and service with, natural gas district.

Any municipality having its own natural gas transmission system in any county bordering the State of Alabama in which U. S. Highway 78 and State Highway 25 intersect and in which there is a publicly supported junior college and which is authorized by Section 21-27-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, to extend its natural gas transmission lines may, in its discretion, enter into a contract for service with any natural gas district organized under the laws of this state, any part of which is located in said county. Such municipality may use such contract in determining the amount of funds available for the repayment of any bonds issued for this purpose in accordance with law.

Said natural gas district may enter into a contract with said municipality to the extent of such municipality’s authorization under Section 21-27-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the construction of gas transmission lines within such district and for supplying the customers within such district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 310, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 27, 1974).

§ 21-27-41.
Ordinance to be enacted before bonds are issued.

Whenever the governing authorities of any municipality shall determine to issue bonds pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23 to acquire or improve a system, it shall cause an estimate to be made of the cost of such system or improvement, and the fact that such estimate has been made shall appear in the ordinance authorizing the issuance of such bonds, which ordinance shall set forth a brief description in general terms of the contemplated system or improvement, the estimated life thereof, the said estimated cost thereof, the amount, date, denominations, rate of interest, times and places of payment and other details in connection with the issuance of the bonds, and such covenants and restrictions as may be necessary or desirable to safeguard the interests of the holders of the bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes 1942, § 3519-10; Laws, 1934, chs. 316, 317; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 10; Laws, 1971, ch. 504, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1971).

§ 21-27-43.
Electorate to vote on issuance of bonds.

Except as hereinafter provided, no bonds shall be issued pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23 until and unless a majority of those qualified electors of the municipality, voting on a proposition stating in general terms the maximum amount and purposes of the bonds, have approved the issuance at a special election called thereon according to law.

However, the requirement for an election to be held before the issuance of the bonds shall not apply to the issuance of the revenue bonds for the purpose of improving, repairing or extending any waterworks system, water supply system, sewage system, sewage disposal system (or the addition of a sewage disposal system to a sewage system), gas producing system, gas generating, transmission, or distribution system, electric generating, transmission, or distribution system, garbage disposal system, rubbish disposal or incinerator system, or motor vehicle transportation system, which is now, or hereafter, owned or operated by any municipality, or railroad transportation system owned or operated by any municipality located in a county bordering the Mississippi River and in which Highways 49 and 61 intersect. The revenue bonds may be issued for such purposes in the following manner: notice of intention to issue the revenue bonds, setting out the amount and other terms or conditions of the proposed issue, shall be given by publication once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a local newspaper published in the municipality, and if a newspaper is not published in the municipality, then in some newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality. After ten (10) days from the last publication of the notice, the bonds may be sold under the regular procedure for selling the bonds unless, within ten (10) days after the last publication of the notice, a petition signed by not less than twenty percent (20%) of the qualified voters of such municipality be filed objecting to and protesting against such revenue bond issue, in which event the same shall not be made unless submitted to a special election ordered for the purpose of determining whether or not a majority of those voting in the election shall vote for or against the revenue bond issue. The election shall be ordered to be held not later than forty (40) days after the date of the last notice of the proposed revenue bond issue. Notice of the election, stating the purpose of the election, shall be published once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks next preceding the time set for holding the election in the newspaper, provided in this section. The laws governing municipal elections shall govern the order and conduct of the election. However, nothing in this section shall prevent the governing authorities from calling an election, whether required by petition of twenty percent (20%) of the qualified voters or not. This section shall not have application to and it shall not affect the authority granted public utilities commissions under Section 21-27-25.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-13; Laws, 1934, ch. 317; Laws, 1936, ch. 186; Laws, 1942, ch. 231; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 13; Laws, 1958, ch. 529, § 4; Laws, 1999, ch. 520, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 21-27-45.
Details of bonds; sale; fiscal advisor.

Such bonds as may be issued pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23 may be serial or term; redeemable, with or without premium, or nonredeemable; registered or coupon bonds with registration privileges as to either principal and interest, principal only or both. They shall bear interest at a rate to be determined pursuant to the sale of the bonds, and shall be payable at such time or times as shall be prescribed in the ordinance authorizing them. They shall mature at such time or times, not exceeding the said estimated life of the contemplated system or improvement, and in no event longer than thirty (30) years from their date, and at such place or places as shall be prescribed in the ordinance authorizing their issuance. Any provisions of the general laws to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds and interest coupons issued pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23 shall possess all the qualities of negotiable instruments. The bonds and the interest coupons shall be executed in such manner and shall be substantially in the form prescribed in the authorizing ordinance. In case any of the officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear on the bonds or interest coupons shall cease to be such officers before delivery of such bonds, such signatures or countersignatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest. Each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid. All bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted. The lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. Such bonds shall be sold in such manner and upon such terms as the governing authorities of the municipality shall determine, provided that such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the interest rate on any one (1) interest maturity shall not exceed the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds. Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%). If serial bonds, such bonds shall mature annually, and the first maturity date thereof shall not be more than five (5) years from the date of such bonds. Such bonds shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the state of Mississippi. The bonds and interest coupons shall be exempt from all state, county, municipal and other taxation under the laws of the state of Mississippi. The principal of and interest upon such bonds shall be payable solely for the revenues derived from the operation of the system acquired or improved with proceeds of the sale of such bonds. No bond issued pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23 shall constitute an indebtedness of a municipality within the meaning of any statutory or charter restriction, limitation or provision. It shall be plainly stated on the face of each such bond in substance that the same has been issued pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23 and that the taxing power of the municipality issuing the same is not pledged to the payment of such bond or interest thereon, and that such bond and the interest thereon are payable solely from the revenues of the system to acquire or improve which such bond is issued.

Such bonds shall be sold on sealed bids at public sale in the manner provided by Section 31-19-25. In the event the issuing municipality shall have received a commitment from any agency of the United States of America for the purchase of all or any portion of an issue of such bonds prior to the sale thereof or for financial assistance in providing debt service on such bonds, then, and in such event, said issue or any part thereof may be sold to the United States of America or any agency thereof at private sale. Provided, however, no bonds issued under the authority of Section 21-27-23 shall bear an overall maximum interest rate greater than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972.

It is specifically provided that any bond issue to be awarded and sold to the United States of America or any agency thereof shall mature at such time or times, not to exceed thirty-five (35) years, as shall be prescribed in the ordinance of the municipality authorizing their issuance.

It is specifically provided that any bond issue to be awarded and sold to the United States of America or any agency thereof may be issued as one or more amortized bonds without coupons, may be dated the date of delivery thereof, and the purchase price for such bond or bonds may be delivered in multiple advances, with interest to accrue on the principal advanced form the date of each such advance. The amount of each such advance and the date thereof shall be registered on the reverse of each such bond and attested by the manual signature of the clerk of the municipality.

On issues of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or more, the governing authorities of a municipality may retain the services of a fiscal advisor to assist in the sale of bonds hereunder and pay to such fiscal advisor a fee not to exceed the following amount: Twenty-Five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) plus one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) of the amount of the issue in excess of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00). No such fiscal advisor shall be eligible to bid for or participate in the underwriting of the bonds for which he acted as advisor.

Before a person can qualify as a fiscal advisor under the terms of this section, he shall have been actively engaged in the business of fiscal counseling for municipalities, or the underwriting of municipal bonds, for a period of five (5) years prior to qualifying under this section. A partnership or corporation may become a fiscal advisor hereunder with the same qualifications. Such person, corporation, or partnership shall have had prior experience as a fiscal advisor or been involved in the underwriting or investing in bonds of the state of Mississippi, or one or more of the subdivisions thereof, and such person, partnership or corporation shall be recognized in the fiscal community as a reputable and qualified fiscal advisor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-10; Laws, 1934, chs. 316, 317; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 10; Laws, 1971, ch. 504, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 470, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 302; Laws, 1975, ch. 418; Laws, 1976, ch. 393; Laws, 1977, ch. 466; Laws, 1978, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 458; Laws, 1980, ch. 523, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 3; Laws, 1982, ch 434, § 5; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 21-27-47.
Utilization of revenues of system to pay off bonds.

Any municipality having outstanding bonds issued pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23 shall maintain rates for all the services and facilities afforded by any system, the revenues of which are pledged to the payment of such bonds, which rates shall be sufficient at all times to maintain an interest and bond redemption fund sufficient to pay the interest on and principal of such bonds as and when the same become due and payable and, if so provided in the ordinance authorizing such bonds, to accumulate a reserve in such fund, and to provide for the payment of such cost of operation and maintenance as may be necessary to keep such system at all times in good repair and working order. Such rates shall be fixed by separate ordinance precedent to or at the time of the issuance of such bonds and shall be revised from time to time so as to produce the amounts necessary to provide for the foregoing. Bonds issued pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23 to acquire or improve a system shall be secured by a pledge of an amount of the gross revenues of such system sufficient to maintain such an interest and bond redemption fund. However, if there are then outstanding bonds to the payment of which the revenues of a system have been previously pledged, then, until said outstanding bonds have been retired, bonds issued to improve such system shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues of the system in such an amount only after deductions have been made for servicing the said outstanding bonds and for maintaining and operating the system. Notwithstanding the above provisions, all revenue bonds issued for a specific utility may be issued on an equivalent basis, provided that each and every ordinance authorizing each and every bond issued shall clearly state the basis on which future revenue bond issues shall be provided for in order to place them on an equivalent basis with prior issues.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-11; Laws, 1934, chs. 316, 317; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 11; Laws, 1958, ch. 529, § 3.

§ 21-27-49.
Services of system may be used by municipality.

Whenever any municipality shall issue any bonds or other evidence of indebtedness which are payable solely from revenues to be derived from any system, the governing authorities of such municipality may, by appropriate provision in the ordinance or resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, or by separate resolution or ordinance passed at or prior to the actual sale of such bonds, bind and obligate such municipality to take, for a period not exceeding the full term of such bonds, at least a stated minimum of the services to be afforded by such system and to pay, out of its corporate funds, a least a stated minimum price therefor. Such provision, resolution or ordinance shall constitute a contract between such municipality and all the holders of such bonds.

All such agreements heretofore entered into by any such municipality, whether such bonds have actually been delivered and paid for or not, are hereby ratified, approved and validated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-23; Laws, 1936, ch. 283; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-51.
Refunding bonds; consolidated bonds.

Any municipality which shall have issued bonds pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23, all or any portion of which shall at any time hereafter remain outstanding and unpaid, is hereby authorized, in connection with the issuance of additional bonds hereunder, to issue refunding bonds for the purpose of taking up, paying and redeeming all such outstanding and unpaid bonds. Such refunding bonds and such additional bonds may be authorized and issued separately or may be consolidated into one issue. Such outstanding and unpaid bonds may be refunded without notice and without an election thereon, and such additional bonds may be refunded without notice and without an election except as provided in Section 21-27-43. The proceeds of any such consolidated bonds shall be used to take up, pay and redeem all of such outstanding and unpaid bonds, at their redemption price, and the balance of such proceeds shall be used and expended for the purposes for which the additional bonds were authorized to be issued. In the event any such outstanding bonds, by the terms thereof, shall be redeemable prior to maturity at the option of such municipality, then such option of redemption shall be exercised in the manner provided in such bonds, and the refunding bonds shall not be issued or delivered more than two calendar months in advance of the date upon which such outstanding bonds shall have been called for redemption. In the event that such outstanding bonds, by the terms thereof, be not so redeemable prior to maturity, then the refunding bonds shall not be issued, except concurrently with the surrender and cancellation of a like amount of the bonds to be refunded thereby. All bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall have like incidents and shall be payable from the same source or sources and the payment thereof shall be secured in like manner as are bonds issued pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23. In lieu of selling such portion of such consolidated bonds, as may be required to provide for the redemption of such outstanding bonds, such consolidated bonds may be issued and delivered in exchange for and upon surrender and cancellation of a like amount of the bonds to be refunded thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-09; Laws, 1942, ch. 231; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 9; Laws, 1958, ch. 529, § 2.

§ 21-27-53.
Default on bonds.

The holder of any bond or any interest coupon issued pursuant to the authority granted in Sections 21-27-23 and 21-27-51 may, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceedings at law or in equity, enforce and compel performance by the appropriate official or officials of the municipality of any or all acts and duties to be performed by such municipality under the provisions of Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69 and the ordinance authorizing the issuance of such bond or interest coupon. If there be any default in the payment of the interest on and principal of any of said bonds, any court having jurisdiction in the proper action may, upon petition of the holder of any of such bonds, appoint a receiver to administer and operate the system with power to fix rates and collect charges sufficient to provide for the payment of all bonds outstanding to the payment of which the revenues of such system are pledged and to pay the expenses of operating and maintaining such system and to apply the revenues of such system, all in conformity with the provisions of Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69 and of the ordinance authorizing the issuance of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-12; Laws, 1934, ch. 317; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-55.
Bonds may be called.

The governing authorities of any municipality authorizing revenue bonds pursuant to the authority granted in Sections 21-27-23 and 21-27-51, may make provisions for any of such revenue bonds to be called for payment at any interest payment date before maturity, provided the municipality shall have on hand in its bond and interest fund sufficient moneys, not otherwise appropriated or pledged, in excess of the interest and principal requirements within the next two succeeding calendar, operating or fiscal years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-20; Laws, 1934, ch. 316; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-57.
Disposition of revenues.

In the authorizing order or ordinance, the governing authorities of the municipality shall set aside monthly and shall pledge the revenues of the system or combined system, in separate and special funds as follows: (1) operation and maintenance fund; (2) depreciation fund; (3) bond and interest fund; (4) contingent fund. A sufficient amount shall be set aside each year for the retirement of the bonds and interest. Any surplus revenue remaining shall be disposed of by the governing authorities of the municipality as they may determine from time to time for the best interest of the municipality. However, in the segregation into the several funds the governing authorities may prescribe a reasonable excess amount to be placed in the revenue bond and interest fund from time to time during the earlier years of maturity of such bonds so as to thereby provide and produce a cushion fund to meet any possible deficiencies therein in future years. In the event such excess amounts are provided in the earlier years, the same would be available for such purposes. Bonds pursuant to the authority granted in Sections 21-27-23 and 21-27-51, shall be payable solely from revenues of said project and out of the bond and interest fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-15; Laws, 1934, ch. 316; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-59.
General revenues may be used for operation and maintenance of system.

Nothing in Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69 shall be construed to prohibit the municipality from appropriating and using any part of its available income or revenues derived from any source other than from the operation of such system or combined system in paying any immediate expenses of operation and/or maintenance of any such system or combined system. Nothing in Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69 shall be construed, however, to require the municipality to do so.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-16; Laws, 1934, ch. 316; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-61.
Distribution of revenues and surplus; minutes of municipal governing authorities.

The governing authorities of any municipality shall devote all monies of the system derived from any source other than the issuance of bonds for purposes authorized by the laws of the State of Mississippi, to or for the payment of all operating expenses, including such items as are normally required of utilities for sales development; to or for the payment of all bonds and interest on outstanding revenue bonds, if any, of such system; to or for the acquisition and improvement of the system contingencies; to or for the payment of all other obligations incurred in the operation and maintenance of the system and the furnishing of service; and to or for the creation and maintenance of a cash working fund or a surplus fund to be used for replacement, extension of systems and emergencies. The balance of any monies, including but not limited to, any which have heretofore been classified as revenues or surplus of such system, if any, may be used for any lawful, municipal purpose and may be paid to the governing authorities of the municipality for distribution to the various municipal funds or may be disbursed for such purpose by the governing authorities at their direction. The purpose of any allocation or expenditure of money made pursuant to this section shall be spread upon the minutes of the municipal governing authorities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-17; Laws, 1934, ch. 316; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 17; Laws, 1990, ch. 435, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1990).

§ 21-27-63.
Contracts and liens not impaired.

Nothing in Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69 shall be construed as authorizing any municipality to impair or commit a breach of the obligation of any valid lien or contract created or entered into by it, the intention hereof being to authorize the pledging, setting aside and segregation of gross revenue only where consistent with outstanding obligations of such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-21; Laws, 1934, ch. 316; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-65.
Penalty for failing to set aside trust funds.

If, after the governing authorities of any municipality have issued revenue bonds pursuant to the authority granted in Sections 21-27-23 and 21-27-51, said governing authorities fail or refuse to carry out their duties with reference to setting aside the trust funds, said officers shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon trial and conviction, shall be removed from office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-22; Laws, 1934, ch. 316; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-67.
Construction of sections.

Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69, being necessary for and to secure the public health, safety, convenience and welfare of the municipalities of the State of Mississippi, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

The powers conferred by Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69 shall be in addition to the powers conferred by any other law, general, special or local, and such sections shall, without reference to any other statute or to any charter, be deemed full authority to purchase or improve and to own and operate the authorized revenue producing systems, to fix, maintain, and to collect rates for the facilities afforded by such systems, to issue and to sell the authorized bonds, and shall be construed as an additional and alternative method therefor, any provisions of the general laws of the state or of any charter to the contrary notwithstanding.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3519-13, 3519-29; Laws, 1934, ch. 317; Laws, 1936, ch. 186; Laws, 1942, ch. 231; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, §§ 13, 29; Laws, 1958, ch. 529, § 4.

§ 21-27-69.
Obligations under repealed laws remain valid.

The repeal heretofore of any law authorizing a municipality to borrow money and issue bonds to acquire or improve any system shall not affect the validity of any bonds issued or contracts entered into under the provisions of any such repealed laws.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-30; Laws, 1950, ch. 494, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-71.
Issuance of bonds in municipalities of more than one hundred thousand population.

Whenever the governing authorities of any municipality of more than One Hundred Thousand (100,000) population shall determine to issue bonds under the provisions of Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69, to acquire or improve a system, it shall cause an estimate to be made of the cost of such system or improvement, and the fact that such estimate has been made shall appear in the ordinance authorizing the issuance of such bonds, which ordinance shall set forth a brief description in general terms of the contemplated system or improvement, the estimated life thereof, the said estimated cost thereof, the amount, date, denominations, rate of interest, times and places of payment and other details in connection with the issuance of the bonds, and such covenants and restrictions as may be necessary or desirable to safeguard the interest of the holders of the bonds. Such bonds may be serial or term; redeemable, with or without premium, or nonredeemable; registered or coupon bonds with registration privileges as to either principal and interest, principal only or both. They shall bear interest at a rate to be determined pursuant to the sale of the bonds, and shall be payable at such time or times as shall be prescribed in the ordinance authorizing them. They shall mature at such time or times, not exceeding the said estimated life of the contemplated system or improvement, and in no event exceeding thirty (30) years from their date, and at such place or places as shall be prescribed in the ordinance authorizing their issuance; provided, however, that any bond issue to be awarded and sold to the United States of America or any agency thereof shall mature at such time or times, not to exceed thirty-five (35) years, as shall be prescribed in the ordinance authorizing their issuance. Any provisions of the general laws to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds and interest coupons issued pursuant to the authority of this section shall possess all the qualities of negotiable instruments. The bonds and the interest coupons shall be executed in such manner and shall be substantially in the form prescribed in the authorizing ordinance. In case any of the officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear on the bonds or interest coupons shall cease to be such officers before delivery of such bonds, such signatures or countersignatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest. Each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid. All bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted. The lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. Such bonds shall be sold in such manner and upon such terms as the governing authorities of the municipality shall determine, provided that such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the interest rate on any one (1) interest maturity shall not exceed the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds. If serial bonds, such bonds shall mature annually, and the first maturity date thereof shall not be more than five (5) years from the date of such bonds. Such bonds shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the state of Mississippi. The bonds and interest coupons shall be exempt from all state, county, municipal and other taxation under the laws of the state of Mississippi. The principal of and interest upon such bonds shall be payable solely from the revenues derived from the operation of the system acquired or improved with proceeds of the sale of such bonds. No bond issued pursuant to this section shall constitute an indebtedness of a municipality within the meaning of any statutory or charter restriction, limitation or provision. It shall be plainly stated on the face of each such bond in substance that the same bond has been issued under the provisions of this section and that the taxing power of the municipality issuing the same is not pledged to the payment of such bond or interest thereon, and that such bond and interest thereon are payable solely from the revenues of the system to acquire or improve which such bond is issued.

Such bonds shall be sold on sealed bids at public sale in the manner provided by Section 31-19-25. In the event the issuing municipality shall have received a commitment from any agency of the United States of America for the purchase of all or any portion of an issue of such bonds prior to the sale thereof or for financial assistance in providing debt service on such bonds, then, and in such event, said issue or any part thereof may be sold to the United States of America or any agency thereof at private sale. Bonds in the aggregate amount of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) for any project may be sold at private sale either to underwriters or investors.

On issues of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or more, the governing authorities of a municipality may retain the services of a fiscal advisor to assist in the sale of the bonds hereunder and pay to such fiscal advisor a fee not to exceed the following amount: Twenty-Five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) plus one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) of the amount of the issue in excess of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00). No such fiscal advisor shall be eligible to bid for or participate in the underwriting of the bonds for which he acted as advisor.

Before a person can qualify as a fiscal advisor under the terms of this section, he shall have been actively engaged in the banking business, or the business of fiscal counseling for municipalities, or the underwriting of municipal bonds, for a period of five (5) years prior to qualifying under this section. A partnership or corporation may become a fiscal advisor hereunder with the same qualifications. Such person, corporation, or partnership shall have had prior experience as a fiscal advisor or been involved in the underwriting or investing in bonds of the state of Mississippi, or one or more of the subdivisions thereof, and such person, partnership or corporation shall be recognized in the fiscal community as a reputable and qualified fiscal advisor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3519-31.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 523, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 6; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 21-27-73.
Contract for purchase of supply of natural gas from any public nonprofit corporation for up to 10 years.

The governing authority of any municipality that owns and operates a gas distribution system, as defined in Section 21-27-11(b), and the governing authority of any public natural gas district are authorized to contract for the purchase of the supply of natural gas for a term of up to ten (10) years with any public nonprofit corporation which is organized under the laws of this state or any other state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 560, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 14, 2004.).

§ 21-27-75.
Authority to enter
into interlocal agreement with rural water associations operating
within corporate limits of municipality that requires associations
to terminate water service of certain customers; agreement requirements.

The governing authoritiesof a municipality are authorized and empowered, in their discretion,to enter into an interlocal agreement with a rural water associationoperating within the corporate limits of the municipality that requiresthe association to terminate the water service of any of its customerswho are thirty (30) days or more delinquent in the payment of chargesfor sewer services provided by the municipality.

Any agreement enteredinto under this section shall at a minimum:

Require the municipalityto notify the association of any customer of the association who alsohas sewer service provided by the municipality who is thirty (30)days or more delinquent in the payment of sewer charges by a methodagreeable to the municipality and the association;

Provide that upon receiptof a notification the association shall terminate the water serviceof the named customer;

Provide that upon satisfactionof the delinquency and any fees connected with the delinquency andthe termination of water service, the association shall restart thewater service of the customer;

Provide that the municipalityshall save and hold harmless the association against any and all claimsbased on the disconnection of water or sewer service and any otherdamages resulting from any action taken by the association under aninterlocal agreement entered into under this section.

Upon entering into an interlocal agreementunder this section, the association is authorized to terminate thewater service of any customer delinquent in the payment of sewer chargesto the municipality pursuant to the terms of the interlocal agreement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 330, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).